Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 49-15-1.
Public policy of the state as to seafood laws.

As a guide to the interpretation and application of this chapter, the public policy of this state shall be to recognize the need for a concerted effort to work toward the protection, propagation and conservation of its seafood and aquatic life in connection with the revitalization of the seafood industry of the State of Mississippi, which is one of the state’s major economic resources and affords a livelihood to thousands of its citizens; and in this connection, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide a modern, sound, comprehensive and workable law to be administered by specialists, who are vested with full and ample authority to take such action as may be necessary in order to help protect, conserve and revitalize seafood life in the State of Mississippi; it being at all times remembered that all of the wild aquatic life found in the waters of the State of Mississippi and on the bottoms of such waters, until taken therefrom in the manner hereinafter prescribed, is recognized as the property of the State of Mississippi because of its very nature, as well as because of the great value of the state of the aquatic life for food and other necessary purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).

§ 49-15-1.1.
Assent to Pittman-Robertson Wildlife Restoration Act and Dingell-Johnson Sport Fish Restoration Act.

The State of Mississippi hereby assents to the provisions of the Pittman-Robertson Wildlife Restoration Act [16 USCS Section 699 et seq.] and the Dingell-Johnson Sport Fish Restoration Act [16 USCS Section 777 et seq.]. The Commission on Marine Resources may perform any acts as may be necessary to ensure the conservation of fish and marine life. Revenue from saltwater license sales shall be controlled only by the Department of Marine Resources and used only when exercising responsibilities specific to the management of the state’s fish and marine resources for which the department has authority under state law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 503, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 22, 2013).

§ 49-15-2.
Standards for fishery conservation and management; fishery management plans.

Any fishery management plan, and any regulation promulgated to implement that plan or promulgated under the state seafood laws, shall be consistent with the following standards for fishery conservation and management:

Conservation and management measures shall be based upon the best scientific information available;

If it becomes necessary to allocate or assign fishing privileges among various fishermen, that allocation shall be (i) fair and equitable to those fishermen, (ii) reasonably calculated to promote conservation, and (iii) carried out in a manner that no particular individual, corporation or other entity acquires an excessive share of the privileges;

Conservation and management measures shall, where practicable, consider efficiency in the utilization of fishery resources, but no measure shall have economic allocation as its sole purpose;

Conservation and management measures shall take into account and allow for variations among, and contingencies in, fisheries, fishery resources, and catches;

Conservation and management measures shall, where practicable, minimize costs and avoid unnecessary duplication;

Conservation and management measures shall, consistent with the conservation requirements of this state (including the prevention of overfishing and rebuilding of overfished stocks), take into account the importance of fishery resources to fishing communities in order to (i) provide for the sustained participation of the communities, and (ii) to the extent practicable, minimize adverse economic impacts on those communities;

Conservation and management measures shall, to the extent practicable, (i) minimize bycatch, and (ii) to the extent bycatch cannot be avoided, minimize the mortality of that bycatch; and

Conservation and management measures shall, to the extent practicable, promote the safety of human life at sea.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 25, eff from and after July 2, 1997.

§ 49-15-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources.

“Department” means the Department of Marine Resources.

“Domicile” means a person’s principal or primary place of abode in which a person’s habitation is fixed and to which the person, whenever absent, has the present intention of returning after a departure of absence therefrom, regardless of the duration of the absence. The burden of proving domicile in the State of Mississippi shall be on the person claiming that status. A person holding a current driver’s license shall be deemed to be domiciled within the state issuing the license. If a person does not hold a current driver’s license the following evidence may be considered in establishing, but is not necessarily determinative of domicile: residence for income or other tax purposes, homestead exemption receipt or other means prescribed by the commission. In the case of minors, domicile of the parents shall be used as evidence of the minor’s domicile.

“Game fish” means cobia, also known as ling or lemonfish (rachycentron canadum). The cobia is classified as game fish.

“Illegal oysters” means:

All untagged shell stock;

Shell oysters obtained from uncertified shops or dealers or from an unlicensed catcher;

Oysters obtained from waters not declared safe and sanitary by the department, except those oysters caught by the commission for re-laying or under private leases pursuant to Section 49-15-27;

Shucked oysters obtained from uncertified shops or repackers.

“Inspector” means the chief inspector, the assistant chief inspector, deputy inspector, bureau director and certified enforcement officer employed by the department.

“Natural reefs” means any bottom under the jurisdiction of the commission of one or more acres on which oysters grow naturally, or have grown naturally, in a quantity sufficient to warrant commercial fishing as a means of livelihood, or have been used in such a manner within a period of ten (10) years next preceding the time the bottoms may come up for determination by the commission.

“Resident” means a person, firm or corporation that is domiciled in this state.

“Seafood” means all oysters, saltwater fish, saltwater shrimp, diamondback terrapin, sea turtle, crabs and all other species of marine or saltwater animal life existing or living in the waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi.

“Tonging reefs” means any bottom under the jurisdiction of the commission designated by the commission as an area in which oysters may be taken by use of hand tongs, as provided in Section 49-15-39.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 23; Laws, 1982, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 395, § 6; Laws, 1993, ch. 532, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 603, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 13; Laws, 1996, ch. 436, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 585, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 524, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 49-15-5.
All seafoods initially the property of the state.

All seafoods existing or living in waters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi not held in private ownership legally acquired, and all beds and bottoms of rivers, streams, bayous, lagoons, lakes, bays, sounds and inlets bordering on or connecting with the Gulf of Mexico or Mississippi Sound within such territorial jurisdiction, including all oysters and other shell fish and parts thereof grown thereon, either naturally or cultivated, shall be, continue, and remain the property of the State of Mississippi, to be held in trust for the people thereof until title thereto shall be legally divested in the manner and form hereinafter authorized, and the same shall be under the exclusive control of the commission until the right of private ownership shall vest therein as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-03; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).

§ 49-15-7.
Oyster, clam, cay shells and other shells declared to be property of state.

All shells of dead oysters, clams and other shellfish; and all of the oyster shells, clam shells, mussel shells, dead reef shells, and cay shells, being upon or under the bottom of, or under the tidewaters within the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi, and all beds, banks and accumulations of such shells within such territorial jurisdiction on or under the bottoms of such waters, or surrounded by such waters, being the property of the State of Mississippi are hereby further declared to be the property of the State of Mississippi under the jurisdiction of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6048-01; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 572, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 86, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 49-15-9.
Rights of riparian owners on Gulf Coast defined.

The sole right of planting, cultivating in racks or other structures, and gathering oysters and erecting bathhouses and other structures in front of any land bordering on the Gulf of Mexico or Mississippi Sound or waters tributary thereto belongs to the riparian owner and extends not more than seven hundred fifty (750) yards from the shore, measuring from the average low water mark, but where the distance from shore to shore is less than fifteen hundred (1500) yards, the owners of either shore may plant and gather to a line equidistant between the two (2) shores, but no person shall plant in any natural channel so as to interfere with navigation, and such riparian rights shall not include any reef or natural oyster bed and does not extend beyond any channel. A riparian owner shall comply with the Coastal Wetlands Protection Act in exercising the use of these riparian rights. Stakes of such frail materials as will not injure any watercraft may be set up to designate the bounds of the plantation, but navigation shall not be impeded thereby. The riparian owner shall clearly mark such cultivation racks and other structures. The commission may adopt regulations to require that the racks are adequately marked to ensure the safety of users of public waters. Any oysters planted by such riparian owner are the private property of such riparian owner, subject to the right of the commission to adopt reasonable rules and regulations as to the planting and gathering of such oysters. All bathhouses, piers, wharfs, docks and pavilions, or other structures owned by riparian owner are likewise the private property of such owner, who shall be entitled to the exclusive use, occupancy and possession thereof, and may abate any private or public nuisance committed by any person or persons in the area of his riparian ownership and may, for such purposes, resort to any remedial action authorized by law. The governing authorities of any municipality and the board of supervisors of any county are authorized to adopt reasonable rules and regulations to protect riparian owners in the enjoyment of their riparian rights, and for such purposes may regulate the use of beaches, landings, and riparian areas abutting or fronting on roads, streets or highways.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-10; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 10; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 10; Laws, 1991, ch. 438 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 1991).

§ 49-15-11.
Mississippi Department of Marine Resources; transfer of certain powers and duties from Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks; Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources; definition of terms; composition of department; personnel to be appointed by executive director.

The Mississippi Department of Marine Resources is hereby established and full power is vested in the department to manage, control, supervise, enforce and direct any matters pertaining to saltwater aquatic life and marine resources under the jurisdiction of the commission.

The Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources shall have the authority to internally reorganize the Department of Marine Resources. For a period of six (6) months after April 16, 2014, the personnel actions of the executive director shall be exempt from State Personnel Board rules, regulations and procedures in order to give the executive director flexibility in making an orderly, effective and timely reorganization of the Department of Marine Resources.

The department shall be composed of the following offices:

Office of Coastal Resources Management;

Office of Finance and Administration;

Office of Marine Fisheries;

Office of Marine Patrol; and

Office of Coastal Restoration and Resiliency.

Each office shall be composed of the administrative units as set forth in the reorganization plan developed by the executive director.

The following agency personnel shall be appointed by the executive director:

Chief Financial Officer who shall have a minimum of a Master’s degree in Business Administration, Accounting or related field and a minimum of five (5) years’ experience in business management or accounting practice.

Chief of Marine Patrol who shall be a certified law enforcement officer with a minimum of ten (10) years of law enforcement experience.

Chief Scientific Officer who shall have a minimum of a Master’s degree in Coastal Sciences or related field with a minimum of five (5) years of experience in coastal resource management or equivalent experience.

The executive director shall have an annual audit of the department, including the accounts established in Section 49-15-17, performed by an independent certified public accountant and shall file the audit report with the commission, the Chairman of the Senate Ports and Marine Resources Committee, the Chairman of the House Marine Resources Committee, the State Auditor and the Legislative Budget Office.

Whenever the terms “Mississippi Marine Conservation Commission,” “Marine Conservation Commission,” “Bureau of Marine Resources” and “Mississippi Marine Resources Council” appear in any state law, they shall mean the “Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 4; Laws, 1964, ch. 245, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 572, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 24; Laws, 1993, ch. 603, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 585, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 496, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2014).

§ 49-15-12.
Transfer of duties to comply with Sections 5-11-1 through 5-11-5; personnel actions; merit promotion system.

The Department of Marine Resources and the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall comply with Sections 5-11-1 through 5-11-5 in the transfer of the marine law enforcement division.

All personnel actions initiated as a result of the transfer of law enforcement officers shall be subject to the State Personnel Board rules, regulations and procedures. The executive director shall implement a merit promotion system for all law enforcement officers. The merit promotion system shall be based on an individual’s merit and length of service.

The transfer of personnel shall be commensurate with the number and classification of positions (PINS) allocated to the Division of Marine Law Enforcement on January 1, 1999. The transfer shall also include direct support, clerical, data processing, communications and boating safety pins and resources.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 585, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 49-15-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2000, ch. 603, § 3, eff from and after May 20, 2000.

[Codes, 1993, ch. 605, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 16; Laws, 1997, ch. 600, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§ 49-15-15.
Powers and duties of commission.

In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the commission shall have the following powers and duties regarding the regulation of seafood:

To exercise full jurisdiction and authority over all marine aquatic life and to regulate any matters pertaining to seafood, including cultivated seafood;

To adopt, promulgate, amend or repeal, after due notice and public hearing, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law and subject to the limitations in subsection (2) of this section, rules and regulations authorized under this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations necessary for the protection, conservation or propagation of all seafood in the waters under the territorial jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi and for the regulation of gill net and purse seine fishermen. All public hearings under this chapter concerning the regulation of marine resources shall be held in Hancock, Harrison or Jackson Counties. Each rule or regulation promulgated under this chapter shall immediately be advertised one (1) time in a newspaper or newspapers having general circulation in counties affected by that regulation. A regulation shall become effective at 6:00 a.m. on the day after its publication;

To regulate all seafood sanitation and processing programs. In the three (3) coastal counties, the sanitation program regulating processing plants and seafood sold in retail stores operating in conjunction with a processing plant or seafood market that primarily deals with seafood is under the exclusive authority of the commission. The commission may also inspect and regulate those areas of any seafood processing plant which process freshwater species at any site where the department inspects seafood processing plants. To effectively and efficiently implement the state seafood sanitation program, the State Health Officer, the Commissioner of Agriculture and the executive director of the department may enter into a memorandum of understanding, which at a minimum, clearly specifies the responsibilities of each agency in implementing the seafood sanitation program, as well as the sharing of information and communication and coordination between the agencies;

To set standards of measure;

To set requirements for employment of commission employees whose compensation shall be governed by the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board;

To acquire and dispose of commission equipment and facilities;

To keep proper records of the commission, including an official ordinance book which contains all rules and regulations promulgated by the commission under this chapter;

To enter into advantageous interstate and intrastate agreements with proper officials, which directly or indirectly result in the protection, propagation and conservation of the seafood of the State of Mississippi, or continue any such agreements now in existence;

To arrange, negotiate or contract for the use of available federal, state and local facilities which would aid in the propagation, protection and conservation of the seafood of the State of Mississippi;

To authorize the operation of double rigs in the waters lying between the mainland coast and the island chain, and those rigs shall not exceed a length of twenty-five (25) feet at the corkline, and to prescribe the length at the lead line for each rig, net or try-trawl;

To destroy or dispose of equipment or nets which have been lawfully seized by the commission and which are not sold under Section 49-15-201 et seq.;

To open, close and regulate fishing seasons for the taking of shrimp, oysters, fish taken for commercial purposes and crabs and set size, catching and taking regulations for all types of seafood and culling regulations for oysters, except as otherwise specifically provided by law;

To utilize the resources of the Gulf Coast Research Laboratory to the fullest extent possible;

To develop a resource management plan to preserve seafood resources and to ensure a safe supply of these resources;

To prescribe types and forms of scientific permits for public educational or scientific institutions, federal and state agencies and consultants performing marine resource studies;

To suspend the issuance of licenses when necessary to impose a moratorium to conserve a fishery resource;

To promote, construct, monitor and maintain artificial fishing reefs in the marine waters of the State of Mississippi and in adjacent federal waters; to accept grants and donations of money or materials from public and private sources for such reefs; to set permit fees and establish guidelines for the construction of artificial reefs in federal waters; and to apply for any federal permits necessary for the construction or maintenance of artificial fishing reefs in federal waters. The location data associated with artificial reefs by corporations and private individuals shall not be published by the commission or the department on the Web site or in written publications of the department. Location data of the artificial reefs may be requested in writing by any individual and shall be provided by the Department in a timely manner; and

To require, in addition to other licensing requirements, the successful completion of educational or training programs on shellfish sanitation as a prerequisite to receiving commercial licenses authorized under this chapter in order to ensure compliance with the Interstate Shellfish Sanitation Conference’s educational requirements for shellfish processors, dealers and harvesters by January 1, 2014.

The commission shall not adopt rules, regulations or ordinances pertaining to marine resources which are more stringent than federal regulations. In any case where federal laws and regulations are silent on a matter pertaining to marine resources, the laws and regulations of the State of Mississippi shall control. The commission shall review all marine resource ordinances for compliance with the no more stringent standard and revise any ordinances more stringent than this standard no later than December 31, 1992. This subsection shall not apply to rules, regulations or ordinances pertaining to the wild stock of marine fin fish.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-06; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 6; Laws, 1962, ch. 193, § 9; Laws, 1974, ch. 572, § 4; Laws, 1975, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 380; Laws, 1981, ch. 537, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 446, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 512, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 562, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 521, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 50; Laws, 1995, ch. 611, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 18; Laws, 1999, ch. 558, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 557, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 450, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2013).

§ 49-15-16.
Limited entry fisheries management program.

The commission may develop a limited entry fisheries management program for all resource groups. The commission may require a license for each resource group and shall establish the fees for such licenses. The commission may establish a means test or any other criteria to determine eligibility for licenses under the limited entry program. The commission may impose a moratorium on the issuance of licenses for a fishery resource.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 558, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 1999.).

§ 49-15-17.
Seafood Fund; special accounts; sources of funds.

All monies received or obtained by the commission under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over by the commission to the State Treasurer and shall be deposited into the fund known as the “Seafood Fund.” All revenues collected through the department, to include, but not limited to, commercial saltwater licenses and taxes, permits, fines and penalties, and confiscated catches, shall be deposited into the department operating account (Seafood Fund) and expended for the operation of the department, as authorized by the Legislature.

There is established a special account to be known as the “Artificial Reef Program Account” within the Seafood Fund. Any funds received from any public or private source for the purpose of promoting, constructing, monitoring or maintaining artificial reefs in the marine waters of the state or in federal waters adjacent to the marine waters of the state shall be credited to the account. Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the Seafood Fund, but shall remain in the account. The department may expend any funds in the account, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, to accomplish the purpose of the account.

There is established a special account to be known as the “Coastal Preserve Account” within the Seafood Fund. Any funds received from any public or private source for the purpose of management, improvement and acquisition of coastal preserves in the state and money required to be deposited pursuant to Sections 27-19-56.10 and 27-19-56.27, shall be credited to the account. Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the Seafood Fund, but shall remain in the account. The department may expend any funds in the account, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, for the management, improvement and acquisition of coastal preserves.

There is established a special account to be known as the “Mississippi Seafood Marketing Program Account” within the Seafood Fund. Monies required to be deposited into the account under Section 27-19-56.27 and any funds received from any public or private source for the purpose of promoting the Mississippi seafood industry must be credited to the account. Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal year do not lapse into the Seafood Fund, but remain in the account. The department may expend any funds in the account, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, to accomplish the purposes of this account including, but not limited to, providing funds for cobia stock enhancement programs.

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund and interest earned on the principal shall be credited to the fund.

The secretary of the commission shall keep accurate reports of monies handled as a part of the permanent records of the commission, and the State Treasurer shall furnish the secretary of the commission such forms as may be needed, and the secretary shall account for such forms in his reports to the Treasurer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 14; Laws, 1999, ch. 558, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 536, § 18; Laws, 2003, ch. 529, § 20; Laws, 2005, ch. 532, § 3; Laws, 2011, ch. 523, § 46; brought forward and amended, Laws, 2013, ch. 560, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-15-18.
Distribution of chapter.

The executive director of the department shall publish an abstract copy of this chapter and all subsequent amendments to this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated by the commission under this chapter. The department may distribute the publication to all persons requesting a copy and to each licensee at the time of issuance of the license. New regulations and amendments to this chapter may be supplied to each licensee within a reasonable time after their promulgation or passage. The department may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed actual cost for its publications.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 1, eff from and after July 2, 1997.

§ 49-15-19.
Attorney General; designation of deputies or assistants; legal advisors to commission and department.

The Attorney General shall be counsel and attorney for the commission and department and shall provide legal services as may be requested. The executive director is authorized to employ legal counsel, after consultation with the Attorney General, as may be necessary or appropriate for the operation of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 15; Laws, 1998, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 574, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 383, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2000.).

§ 49-15-21.
Enforcement officers; reserve unit.

The executive director shall appoint the necessary enforcement officers for the administration of this chapter. The salary of all enforcement officers employed shall be as determined by the State Personnel Board. However, the members of the Enforcement Officers’ Reserve Unit created in subsection (4) shall serve without pay, and shall not be employees of the State of Mississippi for purposes of the State Personnel System, the Workers’ Compensation Law, the Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan.

All enforcement officers shall be experienced and qualified persons thoroughly familiar with the seafood business and shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age and be a high school graduate or its equivalent. The enforcement officers shall diligently enforce all laws and regulations for the protection, propagation, preservation or conservation of all saltwater aquatic life of the State of Mississippi, and they are hereby constituted peace officers of the State of Mississippi, with full police power and jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi and all regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. Enforcement officers may exercise such powers in any county of the State of Mississippi and on any waters of the state, and they are hereby authorized to carry firearms or other weapons, concealed or otherwise, and they shall investigate all persons, corporations and otherwise who are alleged to have violated any laws, and make affidavits, arrests and serve papers of any court of competent jurisdiction, in like manner as is provided for sheriffs and deputy sheriffs, when the same shall be in connection with the enforcement of the seafood laws of the State of Mississippi and such other laws and regulations of this state as the commission may designate. The enforcement officers may seize at any time aquatic life caught, taken or transported in a manner contrary to the laws of this state, and may confiscate and dispose of the same. Any net or other paraphernalia used or employed in connection with a violation may be seized, and forfeiture proceedings may be instituted. Enforcement officers may draft the aid of captains, crews and boats or licensed vessels to enforce this chapter and may, without warrant, board and search vessels or vehicles. The application for any license or permit from the commission to catch, fish, take, transport or handle or process any form of aquatic life, or the taking, catching, transporting or handling or processing of any and all aquatic life in this state shall constitute acquiescence and agreement upon the part of the owners, captains and crews, employers and dealers to the provisions of this chapter and the agreement that enforcement officers may exercise the authority granted under the provisions hereof.

Prior to entering into performance of their duties or delegations or as soon after appointment as possible, each enforcement officer, at the expense of the commission, shall attend and complete an appropriate curriculum in the field of law enforcement at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy or other law enforcement training program approved under Section 45-6-7. However, members of the Enforcement Officers’ Reserve Unit created in subsection (4) of this section may attend the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy at the expense of the commission if it deems the training necessary or desirable. No enforcement officer shall be entitled to payment of salary after the first twelve (12) months in office if he has either failed to attend the academy or has failed to comply with other qualifications or successfully complete any law enforcement qualification examinations as the director deems necessary. The enforcement officers shall, on a periodic basis, be required to attend additional advanced courses in law enforcement in order that they will be properly improved and trained in the modern, technical advances of law enforcement.

There is hereby created an Enforcement Officers’ Reserve Unit, hereinafter termed “the reserve,” to assist the enforcement officers in the performance of their duties under this chapter. The reserve shall consist of volunteers who are approved by the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources or his designee. The members of the reserve shall serve without pay. Reserve officers shall be in such numbers as determined by the enforcement needs, with the maximum strength of reserve officers limited to the same number as enforcement officers.

To be eligible for membership in the reserve, an applicant must be twenty-one (21) years of age, be a high school graduate or its equivalent, be in good physical condition, have a Mississippi driver’s license, be in good standing with the community, be available for training and duty, not be a member of any police, auxiliary police, civil defense, or private security agency, have never been convicted of a felony, and have one (1) of the following:

An honorable discharge or honorable separation certificate from one (1) of the United States military services;

Three (3) years of responsible post-high school work experience that required the ability to deal effectively with individuals and groups of persons;

Successful completion of sixty (60) semester hours at an accredited college or university; or

The qualifications as are outlined in this section for enforcement officers.

Members oftheimmediate family of enforcement officers shall not be eligibleforthe reserve unless a special waiver is granted.

Upon acceptance into the reserve, members shall receive a temporary appointment for one (1) year. During this year of temporary status, members mustsuccessfullycomplete the required training and must qualify on thesame firearmscourse as enforcement officers.

The reserve shall be under the leadership and direction of the executive director or his designee. The training of the reserve shall be conducted by an enforcement officer. The reserve shall meet at least once each month for the purpose of training and transacting any business as may come before it. The executive director shall be notified in writing of all meetings of the reserve and the time and place of the meetings shall be recorded with the executive director. The executive director shall prepare a reserve officer’s manual with the advice and consent of the commission. The manual shall include, but is not limited to, the following: activities and operations, training, administration and duties. During active service, the reserve shall be under the direction of the executive director or his designated representative. When a reserve officer is on active duty and assigned to a specific enforcement officer, he shall be under the direct supervision of that officer. Reserve officers serve at the discretion of the executive director and may be dismissed by him. Reserve officers shall furnish their own uniforms and other personal equipment if the executive director does not provide such items.

The executive director may require members of the Enforcement Officers’ Reserve Unit to attend officer reserve training programs conducted by county or municipal agencies.

The executive director may issue uniforms to such reserve officers and may authorize the issuance of any state equipment necessary for the reserve officers to adequately assist law enforcement officers. The executive director may develop a reserve officer identification system to accomplish the issuance of such items in accordance with the State Auditor guidelines.

If the executive director determines that a member of the Enforcement Officers’ Reserve Unit may attend a training program as authorized under this section, it shall require that reserve officer to sign an agreement, prior to attending a training program, which shall stipulate that if the reserve officer accepts employment from any other public or private law enforcement agency within three (3) years after completion of his training program, the reserve officer or the respective hiring law enforcement agency shall reimburse the department for the total cost of his training program. By October 1 of each year, the department shall provide the Conservation and Water Resources Committee of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Ports and Marine Resources Committee of the Mississippi Senate a listing which contains each name and the respective cost of training each reserve officer received during the previous year.

HISTORY:
Prior 1972 Code §49-15-21 [Codes, 1942, § 6047-09; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 9; Laws, 1966, ch. 278, § 1; Am, 1974, ch. 542, § 7] repealed by Laws, 1978, ch. 484, § 26. Former §49-15-21 [En, 1980, ch. 553, § 4; Am, 1985, ch. 382, § 1] repealed by Laws, 1985, ch. 382, § 2. New § 49-15-21 enacted, Laws, 1989, ch. 562, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 577, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 522, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 18; Laws, 1997, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 585, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 376, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 363, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 49-15-22.
Marine patrol officers of Department of Marine Resources permitted to keep side arm upon retirement.

Each person employed as a marine patrol officer by the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources who retires for superannuation or for reason of disability under the Public Employees’ Retirement System may, upon his request, be allowed to retain, as his personal property, one (1) side arm which was issued to him during his service, if funds are available for this purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 376, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2002.).

§ 49-15-23.
Establishment of dividing line between salt and fresh waters; notice.

The Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources and the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks are hereby authorized and empowered to establish the dividing line between salt and fresh waters, and when such line has been established and notice thereof given as provided herein, it shall be recognized in the courts in connection with any proceedings under the game and fish laws of this state. Such line may be changed from time to time by the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources and the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks on proper publication of such changes.

In establishing the dividing line between salt and fresh waters, no part of the Bay of St. Louis shall be declared to be fresh water.

In establishing the dividing line between salt and fresh waters, none of the waters within the municipal boundaries of the City of Pascagoula, as they existed on January 1, 1981, shall be declared to be fresh water.

In establishing the dividing line between salt and fresh waters, no part of Bayou Cassotte and its tributaries, Bang Bayou and its tributaries, Bayou Cumbest and its tributaries, Crooked Bayou, Middle Bayou and that part of Heron Bayou with its tributaries which lie in the State of Mississippi shall be declared to be fresh water.

Whenever any dividing line is established or changed as above provided, notice shall be given to the public by publication for three (3) weeks in a newspaper published and having general circulation in the county or counties affected thereby, and a description of the dividing line shall be filed in the office of the chancery clerk of such counties or county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6051.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 191, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 195, § 6; Laws, 1971, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1994.